Nebraska, session 109, LB106.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB106 LB106
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 60-6,257, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
60-6,257 (1) It shall be unlawful for a person to drive a motor
vehicle required to be registered in this state upon a highway:
(a) If the windows in such motor vehicle are tinted so that the
driver's clear view through the windshield or side or rear windows is
reduced or the ability to see into the motor vehicle is substantially
impaired;
(b) If the windshield has any sunscreening material that is not
clear and transparent below the AS-1 line or if it has a sunscreening
material that is red, yellow, or amber in color above the AS-1 line;
(c) If the front side windows have any sunscreening or other
transparent material that has a luminous reflectance of more than twenty
thirty-five percent or has light transmission of less than twenty thirty-
five percent;
(d) If the rear window or side windows behind the front seat have
sunscreening or other transparent material that has a luminous
reflectance of more than twenty thirty-five percent or has light
transmission of less than twenty percent except for the rear window or
side windows behind the front seat on a multipurpose vehicle, van, or
bus; or
(e) If the windows of a camper, motor home, pickup cover, slide-in
camper, or other motor vehicle do not meet the standards for safety
glazing material specified by federal law in 49 C.F.R. 571.205.
(2) For purposes of this section and sections 60-6,258 and 60-6,259:
(a) AS-1 line shall mean a line extending from the letters AS-1,
found on most motor vehicle windshields, running parallel to the top of
the windshield or shall mean a line five inches below and parallel to the
top of the windshield, whichever is closer to the top of the windshield;
(b) Camper shall mean a structure designed to be mounted in the
cargo area of a truck or attached to an incomplete vehicle with motive
-2-

LB106 LB106
2025 2025
power for the purpose of providing shelter for persons;
(c) Glass-plastic glazing material shall mean a laminate of one or
more layers of glass and one or more layers of plastic in which a plastic
surface of the glazing faces inward when the glazing is installed in a
vehicle;
(d) Light transmission shall mean the ratio of the amount of total
light, expressed in percentages, which is allowed to pass through the
sunscreening or transparent material to the amount of total light falling
on the motor vehicle window;
(e) Luminous reflectance shall mean the ratio of the amount of total
light, expressed in percentages, which is reflected outward by the
sunscreening or transparent material to the amount of total light falling
on the motor vehicle window;
(f) Motor home shall mean a multipurpose passenger vehicle that
provides living accommodations;
(g) Multipurpose vehicle shall mean a motor vehicle designed to
carry ten or fewer passengers that is constructed on a truck chassis or
with special features for occasional off-road use;
(h) Pickup cover shall mean a camper having a roof and sides but
without a floor designated to be mounted on and removable from the cargo
area of a truck by the user;
(i) Slide-in camper shall mean a camper having a roof, floor, and
sides designed to be mounted on and removable from the cargo area of a
truck by the user; and
(j) Sunscreening material shall mean a film, material, tint, or
device applied to motor vehicle windows for the purpose of reducing the
effects of the sun.
Sec. 2. Original section 60-6,257, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-